Washington statutes.
RCW 43.12.045

Rule-making authority.

For rules adopted after July 23, 1995, the commissioner of public lands may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule.

[ 1995 c 403 s 101.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.